Hawaii statutes.
Rule 612 Writing used to refresh memory.
If a witness uses a writing to refresh the witness' memory for the purpose of
testifying, either:

(1) While testifying, or

(2) Before testifying, if the court in its discretion
determines it is necessary in the interests of justice,

an adverse party is entitled to have the writing
produced at the hearing, to inspect it, to cross-examine the witness thereon,
and to introduce in evidence those portions which relate to the testimony of
the witness. If it is claimed that the writing contains matters not related to
the subject matter of the testimony the court shall examine the writing in
camera, excise any portions not so related, and order delivery of the remainder
to the party entitled thereto. Any portion withheld over objections shall be
preserved and made available to the appellate court in the event of an appeal.
If a writing is not produced or delivered pursuant to order under this rule,
the court shall make any order justice requires, except that in criminal cases
when the prosecution elects not to comply, the order shall be one striking the
testimony or, if the court in its discretion determines that the interests of
justice so require, declaring a mistrial. [L 1980, c 164, pt of §1; gen ch
1985]

RULE 612 COMMENTARY

This rule is identical with Fed. R. Evid. 612, except that
the federal rule begins with the phrase, "Except as otherwise provided in
criminal proceedings by section 3500 of title 18, United States Code," and
this phrase is omitted here as inappropriate. The Advisory Committee's Note to
Fed. R. Evid. 612 points out that "[t]he purpose of the rule is...to
promote the search of credibility and memory."

This rule restates existing Hawaii law found in State v.
Altergott, 57 H. 492, 503, 559 P.2d 728, 736 (1977), where the court observed:
"A writing which is used to refresh the recollection of a witness, it is
said by Wigmore, differs from a record of past recollection in being in no
strict sense evidence, so that the offering party has no right to have the jury
see it although the opponent may show it to the jury and the jury may demand
it." In other words, the writing used to refresh memory is not evidence,
and therefore does not present hearsay problems, because, after refreshing, the
witness testifies from present memory, and the writing serves merely as a jog
to present memory. If the witness has no present memory, as in the case where
the attempt to refresh under this rule is unsuccessful, then the admissibility
of the writing is governed by hearsay doctrine (especially Rule 802.1(4),
"Past recollection recorded") and the authentication and original
document requirements of Articles IX and X.

Case Notes

Although recitation by complainant of police report
describing the cell phone text messages would have been inadmissible hearsay
under rules 802.1(4) and 803(b)(8), where complainant could recall substantial
details about the messages prior to reading the report, which suggested that
complainant possessed a memory of the messages that only needed refreshment via
the report, complainant properly testified about the text messages after
viewing the police report pursuant to this rule. 117 H. 127, 176 P.3d 885
(2008).

Officer had sufficient personal knowledge, under rule 602, of
intoxilyzer test officer administered to defendant and was thus competent to
testify as to test results; when officer could not remember exact reading of
test result, it was proper under this rule for State to allow officer to review
defendant's test result report and refresh officer's present recollection of
defendant's exact score. 95 H. 409 (App.), 23 P.3d 744 (2001).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next